Vermont, session 2025-2026, H318.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. chapter 23, subchapter 3 added to read:
Subchapter 3. Computer Science
§ 971. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Computer science” means the study of computers and algorithmic
processes including their principles, their hardware and software designs, their
implementation, and their impact on society. Content should focus on teaching
students how to create new technologies, not simply how to use technology.
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 2 of 15
(2) “Computer science courses and content” means courses in
elementary, middle, or high school that teach computer science as standalone
implementations or, for elementary and middle school, embedded in other
subjects.
(3) “High-quality professional learning” means professional
development activities that:
(A) clarify the conceptual foundations of computer science;
(B) teach research-based practices, including hands-on and inquiry-
based learning; and
(C) are intended for existing teachers with or without prior exposure
to computer science.
(4) “High-quality professional learning providers” means postsecondary
schools, nonprofits, or private entities that have successfully designed,
implemented, and scaled high-quality computer science professional learning
for teachers as defined in subdivision (3) of this section that meets relicensure
credit standards set by the Standards Board for Professional Educators.
§ 972. COMPUTER SCIENCE; REQUIRED COURSE OFFERING
(a) Beginning with the 2025–2026 school year, each public high school
shall offer at least one computer science course for students in grades nine
through 12.
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 3 of 15
(b) Beginning with the 2025–2026 school year, each public school that
operates grades six through eight shall offer instruction in exploratory
computer science to students in those grades.
(c) Beginning with the 2025–2026 school year, each public elementary
school shall offer instruction in the basics of computer science and
computational thinking.
(d) A computer science course or instruction in computer science offered
by a public school shall:
(1) be of high quality, as defined by the State Board of Education; and
(2) meet or exceed the standards and curriculum requirements
established by the State Board of Education.
(e) A computer science course offered by a public high school shall be
offered in an in-person setting. If a traditional classroom setting is not feasible,
the public high school may submit an alternate plan for approval by the
Agency of Education, prior to the start of the school year, to offer a virtual or
distance learning course option. The computer science courses shall be listed
as an option in the school’s course catalog regardless of whether they are
offered in-person or virtually.
(f) Beginning on September 1, 2025 and every September 1 thereafter, each
school district shall submit to the Agency of Education a report for the current
academic year that shall include the following:
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 4 of 15
(1) the names and course codes of computer science courses offered in
each school within the district, including course descriptions and identification
of which State computer science standards are covered, to the extent such
information is available;
(2) the number and percentage of students who enrolled in each
computer science course, disaggregated by the following categories; provided,
however, if the number or percentage would cause the individual identity of
students to be known, the number shall be replaced with a symbol:
(A) gender;
(B) race and ethnicity;
(C) special education status, including students on an IEP or section
504 plan;
(D) English learners;
(F) eligibility for free and reduced-price meals; and
(G) grade level; and
(3) the number of computer science instructors at each school,
disaggregated by:
(A) endorsement, if applicable;
(B) gender;
(C) race and ethnicity; and
(D) highest academic degree obtained.
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 5 of 15
(g) On or before each November 15, the Agency of Education shall make
available to the public on its website:
(1) the data collected pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, as
follows:
(A) the data collected pursuant to subdivisions (f)(1) and (2) of this
section shall be disaggregated by school and aggregated at the State level; and
(B) the data collected pursuant to subdivision (f)(3) shall be posted as
aggregate statewide data; and
(2) a list of computer science course codes and names, including course
description and which courses align to the State computer science standards.
§ 973. COMPUTER SCIENCE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT;
GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Subject to funds appropriated by the General Assembly, the Agency of
Education shall administer a Computer Science Professional Development
Grant Program. This program shall be a competitive grant program to
administer funds to eligible entities to develop and implement teacher
professional development programs for the computer science courses and
content required under this subchapter.
(b) Eligible entities shall include:
(1) supervisory unions, boards of cooperative education services, and
consortiums of supervisory unions; and
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 6 of 15
(2) high-quality computer science professional learning providers,
including postsecondary schools in the State and nonprofit or private entities
working in partnership with supervisory unions.
(c) Eligible uses of grant funds shall be:
(1) high-quality professional learning for kindergarten through grade 12
computer science content, including travel to workshops;
(2) credentialling for kindergarten through grade 12 computer science
teachers, including CTE teachers and supplemental endorsements;
(3) supports for kindergarten through grade 12 computer science
professional learning, including mentoring and coaching;
(4) creation of resources to support implementation; and
(5) student recruitment.
(d) As a condition of receiving grant funds pursuant to this section, eligible
entities shall submit an application to the Agency of Education which, at a
minimum, shall address how the eligible entity will:
(1) reach new and existing teachers with little to no computer science
background;
(2) use research or evidence based practices for high-quality
professional development;
(3) focus the professional learning on the conceptual foundations of
computer science;
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 7 of 15
(4) reach and support marginalized racial and ethnic groups
underrepresented in computer science;
(5) provide teachers with concrete experience with hands-on, inquiry-
based practices;
(6) accommodate the particular teacher and student needs in each
district and school; and
(7) ensure that participating districts shall begin offering the course or
courses and content within the same or next school year after the teacher
receives the professional learning.
(e) The Agency shall prioritize the following applications:
(1) supervisory unions that are working in partnership with providers of
high-quality professional learning for kindergarten through grade 12 computer
science;
(2) proposals that describe strategies to enroll female students, students
from marginalized racial and ethnic groups underrepresented in computer
science, students eligible for free and reduced-price meals, students with
disabilities, and English learners; and
(3) proposals from rural or urban areas with a low penetration of
kindergarten through grade 12 computer science offerings, including
supervisory unions that partner together to form clusters of implementation.
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 8 of 15
(f) Any unused portion of an appropriation made pursuant to this section
shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in
the following fiscal year.
(g) Annually, award recipients shall submit the following data to the
Agency, who shall make the data publicly available on its website:
(1) the number of teachers that participated in teacher computer science-
related teacher preparation;
(2) the number of students reached in total;
(3) the number and percent of students reached, disaggregated by
gender, race or ethnicity, and socioeconomic status;
(4) the number and percentage of students with passing AP exam scores
for high school AP courses, disaggregated by gender and race or ethnicity;
(5) the number of teachers that begin implementing computer science
courses or concepts compared to the number of teachers that attended
professional learning.
§ 974. COMPUTER SCIENCE GRADUATION REQUIREMENT
(a) Beginning with the 2027–2028 school year, each student attending a
public school shall complete one high school level computer science course as
a condition of receiving a high school diploma.
(b) On or before July 1, 2027, the Agency of Education shall adopt a list of
approved courses that students may take to fulfill the requirement of subsection
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 9 of 15
(a) of this section, which shall be made publicly available on the Agency’s
website. The approved courses shall meet or exceed the standards and
curriculum requirements established by the State Board, and may be taken in
middle or high school grades.
(c) A computer science course offered by a public high school shall be
offered in an in-person setting and may be offered as a virtual or distance
course option only when a traditional classroom setting is not possible.
(d) For school years 2027–2031, a public school may submit a signed
notification to the Agency that certifies a computer science course was not
available for its students to fulfill the graduation requirement contained in
subsection (a) of this section, and the Agency may waive the computer science
graduation requirement. The Agency shall maintain a list of schools that
submitted notifications pursuant to this subsection.
(e) For school years 2027–2031, a student may submit a waiver to the
Agency, on a form developed by the Agency, in the event the student is unable
to complete the computer science course graduation requirement, and the
Agency may waive such graduation requirements. The Agency shall maintain
a list of students that submitted waivers pursuant to this subsection.
(f) Computer science courses may also fulfill other existing graduation
requirements.
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 10 of 15
(g)(1) Beginning with July 1, 2028 and every July 1 thereafter, each school
district shall submit a report to the Agency for the previous academic year that
shall include:
(A) the names and course codes of computer science courses offered
in each school within the district, including course descriptions and which
State computer science standards are covered, to the extent such information is
available; and
(B) the number of computer science instructors at each school within
the district, disaggregated by:
(i) endorsement, as applicable;
(ii) gender;
(iii) race and ethnicity; and
(iv) highest academic degree.
(2) The Agency shall publicly post on the Agency’s website the data
received pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection (g), disaggregated by
school.
Sec. 2. COMPUTER SCIENCE STUDENT PERFORMANCE
STANDARDS; STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
On or before July 1, 2026 and pursuant to subdivision 164(9) of this title,
the State Board of Education shall adopt rigorous kindergarten through grade
12 computer science student performance standards. The Board shall consider
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 11 of 15
existing computer science frameworks and content standards, including the K–
12 Computer Science Framework and the kindergarten through grade 12
computer science content standards developed by the Computer Science
Teachers Association.
Sec. 3. COMPUTER SCIENCE EDUCATION TASK FORCE; STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION
(a) The State Board of Education shall establish a computer science
education task force to develop a State strategic plan for expanding computer
science education in elementary and secondary schools.
(b) The Task Force shall include representatives from:
(1) the State Board of Education;
(2) the Agency of Education;
(3) the computer science industry;
(4) applicable nonprofit organizations;
(5) the Vermont Superintendents Association;
(6) Vermont’s postsecondary schools;
(7) the Vermont House of Representatives and the Vermont State
Senate; and
(8) a member of the Vermont National Education Association who
teaches computer science.
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 12 of 15
(c) The Board, in consultation with the Task Force, shall develop a State
strategic plan for a statewide computer science education program, that shall
include the following:
(1) a statement of purpose that describes the objectives or goals the
Board will accomplish by implementing a computer science education
program, the strategies by which those goals will be achieved, and a timeline
for achieving such goals;
(2) a summary of the current State landscape for kindergarten through
grade 12 computer science education, including demographic reporting of
students taking computer science courses;
(3) a plan for expanding computer science education opportunities to
every school in the State within five years, as well as a plan for increasing the
representation of students from traditionally underserved groups in computer
science, including female students, students from historically underrepresented
racial and ethnic groups, students with disabilities, English learner students,
students who qualify for free and reduced-price meals, and rural students;
(4) a plan for the development of rigorous standards and curriculum
guidelines for kindergarten through grade 12 computer science, including ways
to incorporate computer science into existing standards at the elementary level,
as appropriate;
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 13 of 15
(5) a plan for defining high-quality professional learning for teachers to
begin teaching computer science;
(6) on ongoing evaluation process that is overseen by the Board;
(7) proposed rules that incorporate the principles of the master plan into
the State’s public education system as a whole; and
(8) a plan to ensure long-term sustainability.
(d) On or before December 1, 2026, the Board shall submit a written report
with the Board’s State strategic plan, as required under subsection (c) of this
section, to the House and Senate Committees on Education.
(e) The State Board shall cause the Task Force to cease to exist on
December 1, 2027.
Sec. 4. STATE COMPUTER SCIENCE SUPERVISOR; POSITION
(a) There is established within the Agency of Education one full-time
classified position, which shall be a computer science supervisor position
responsible for carrying out the work of this act within the Agency, including
the development and implementation of the computer science education
strategic plan.
(b) There is appropriated to the Agency of Education from the General
Fund in fiscal year 2026 the sum of $150,000.00 for personal services and
operating expenses for the position created in subsection (a) of this section.
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 14 of 15
Sec. 5. INCENTIVES FOR PRE-SERVICE TEACHER PREPARATION
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2027, any program of teacher preparation leading
to a professional license shall include, as part of its curriculum, instruction in
computer science and computational thinking as applied to student learning
and classroom instruction that are grade-level and subject-area appropriate.
(b) From funds appropriated to the Agency of Education, the Agency shall
create a scholarship program for pre-service teachers to take a course in
computer science. A pre-service teacher enrolled in a State accredited
institution of higher education and working towards a degree to become
qualified to teach any kindergarten through grade 12 subject may receive a
scholarship after successful completion of one course in computer science.
The scholarship program will prioritize the recruitment of candidates from
underrepresented groups or candidates who agree to teach computer science in
schools with higher percentages of students from underrepresented groups,
rural schools, or under resourced schools.
(c) From funds appropriated to the Agency of Education, the Agency shall
create a grant program for eligible preservice education programs in the State
to develop and implement pathways in computer science education. The
pathways would prepare an enrolled pre-service teacher to add an endorsement
to teach computer science education to their intended major and area of
certification. The pathways would be open to pre-service teachers at both
VT LEG #380419 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.318
2025 Page 15 of 15
secondary and elementary levels, and may include collaborations among
schools of computer science, schools of education, and nonprofit
organizations.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380419 v.1